apertium-cy-en.en.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?> <!-- -*- nxml -*- -->


<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzáéíóúýÁÉÍÓÚÝ</alphabet>
  <!-- Symbol definitions -->
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-cy-en.symbols.xml"/>

<pardefs>




<pardef n="guionet">

    
                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="coma">

    
                              <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="cometa">

   
                              <e>
			      <re>[’'‘]</re>
        <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="numeros">

    
                              <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="separa">

    
                              <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


     <pardef n="separ">

    
                              <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="paresq">

    
                              <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="pardret">

    
                              <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ordinals">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?st</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?nd</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?rd</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?th</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>






 
  <pardef n="expensive__adj">

                             <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>

  </pardef>


  <pardef n="long/__adj">

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>est</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>


  <pardef n="happ/y__adj">

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>ier</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>iest</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>


  <pardef n="sly/__adj">

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>est</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>

  
  <pardef n="sh/y__adj">

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>ier</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>iest</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>yer</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>yest</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>
  

  <pardef n="nice/__adj">

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>r</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>st</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>


  <pardef n="big/__adj">

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>ger</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>gest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>

  
  <pardef n="hot/__adj">

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>ter</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>test</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>

  
  <pardef n="thin/__adj">

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>ner</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>nest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>

  
  <pardef n="dim/__adj">

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>mer</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e>
      <p>
        <l>mest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>


  <pardef n="common/__adj">

                            <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>

                            <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>est</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>

  
  <pardef n="lovel/y__adj">

                            <e>
       <p>
         <l>y</l>
         <r>y<s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>

                            <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ier</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>iest</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>


  <pardef n="handsome/__adj">

                            <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>

                            <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>r</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

                            <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>st</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>

                        <e lm="able"><i>able</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="nude"><i>nude</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="unkind"><i>unkind</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="binary"><i>binar</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="spiky"><i>spik</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="invincible"><i>invincible</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="modest"><i>modest</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="milky"><i>milk</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="wry"><i>wr</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="fine"><i>fine</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="thin"><i>thin</i><par n="thin/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="irregular"><i>irregular</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="inheritable"><i>inheritable</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="slim"><i>slim</i><par n="dim/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="rough"><i>rough</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="strange"><i>strange</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="timely"><i>timel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="ochre"><i>ochre</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="truthful"><i>truthful</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="severe"><i>severe</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="picturesque"><i>picturesque</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="stray"><i>stray</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="risky"><i>risk</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="low"><i>low</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="shy"><i>sh</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="mat"><i>mat</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="molar"><i>molar</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="grey"><i>grey</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="fat"><i>fat</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="elderly"><i>elderl</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="glassy"><i>glass</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="civil"><i>civil</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="soft"><i>soft</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="wide"><i>wide</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="fit"><i>fit</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
                        <e r="LR"><p><l>atmospherical</l><r>atmospheric</r></p><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="big"><i>big</i><par n="big/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="ripe"><i>ripe</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="dumb"><i>dumb</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="net"><i>net</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="grim"><i>grim</i><par n="dim/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="lengthy"><i>length</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="rude"><i>rude</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
                        <e lm="unlikely"><i>unlikel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
                              <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="cometa"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="guionet"/>
      </e>
